Texas statutes.
PARKS AND WILDLIFE CODE

TITLE 7. LOCAL AND SPECIAL LAWS

CHAPTER 134. CASS COUNTY

SUBCHAPTER E. LAKE TEXARKANA

Sec. 134.041. DISCHARGE OF FIREARM. (a) Except as provided in this section, no person may shoot a pistol or rifle in, on, along, or across Lake Texarkana.

(b) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to peace officers, game wardens, or representatives of the department in the lawful discharge of their duties.

(c) Subsection (a) of this section does not apply to a person hunting with a shotgun during an open season or when it is lawful to hunt in or on Lake Texarkana.

(d) Repealed by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 4, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 1405, ch. 545, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1975. Amended by Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 267, art. 4, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.